dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  11042 Y 1
SFX  11042 0 יעכן/64998 .
SFX  8842 Y 1
SFX  8842 0 חתכם/64992 .
SFX  6524 Y 1
SFX  6524 0 חתכם/64993 .
SFX  5911 Y 1
SFX  5911 0 ופיו/64993 .
SFX  13544 Y 1
SFX  13544 ף פי/64992 .
SFX  7699 Y 1
SFX  7699 ף פי/64995 .
SFX  10572 Y 1
SFX  10572 0 וניתם/64993 .
SFX  9093 Y 1
SFX  9093 0 פתה/64991 .
SFX  11860 Y 1
SFX  11860 ח יא/64992 .
SFX  5868 Y 1
SFX  5868 0 פתה/64992 .
SFX  9636 Y 1
SFX  9636 ח יא/64993 .
SFX  7467 Y 1
SFX  7467 0 פתה/64993 .
SFX  11462 Y 1
SFX  11462 ף פתם/64992 .
SFX  9670 Y 1
SFX  9670 0 ילוכם/64992 .
SFX  13860 Y 1
SFX  13860 0 פפי/64992 .
SFX  12810 Y 1
SFX  12810 0 פפי/64993 .
SFX  13674 Y 1
SFX  13674 ו ילה/64992 .
SFX  11017 Y 1
SFX  11017 0 פפי/64995 .
SFX  7024 Y 1
SFX  7024 0 ייהם/64993 .
SFX  9155 Y 1
SFX  9155 0 ריכן/64991 .
SFX  6427 Y 1
SFX  6427 0 ניתכן/64993 .
SFX  13590 Y 1
SFX  13590 0 ריכן/64992 .
SFX  5468 Y 1
SFX  5468 0 ריכן/64993 .
SFX  13196 Y 1
SFX  13196 ר שע/64991 .
SFX  13012 Y 1
SFX  13012 ט יכנו/64991 .
SFX  13345 Y 1
SFX  13345 ר שע/64992 .
SFX  7637 Y 1
SFX  7637 ט יכנו/64992 .
SFX  10805 Y 1
SFX  10805 ט יכנו/64993 .
SFX  11623 Y 1
SFX  11623 0 כנים/64991 .
SFX  13937 Y 1
SFX  13937 0 כנים/64992 .
SFX  12322 Y 1
SFX  12322 0 ילותינו/64991 .
SFX  5909 Y 1
SFX  5909 0 ופיך/64993 .
SFX  8777 Y 1
SFX  8777 0 ילותינו/64993 .
SFX  11931 Y 1
SFX  11931 ם מרנו/64992 .
SFX  12445 Y 1
SFX  12445 0 יעם/64991 .
SFX  5610 Y 1
SFX  5610 0 יעם/64992 .
SFX  9436 Y 1
SFX  9436 0 יעם/64993 .
SFX  12192 Y 1
SFX  12192 0 חתכן/64991 .
SFX  11041 Y 1
SFX  11041 0 יעם/64998 .
SFX  8841 Y 1
SFX  8841 0 חתכן/64992 .
SFX  6523 Y 1
SFX  6523 0 חתכן/64993 .
SFX  5125 Y 1
SFX  5125 0 נים/64991 .
SFX  13523 Y 1
SFX  13523 0 נים/64992 .
SFX  7976 Y 1
SFX  7976 0 נים/64994 .
SFX  7729 Y 1
SFX  7729 ך לא/64992 .
SFX  6391 Y 1
SFX  6391 0 מום/64991 .
SFX  9269 Y 1
SFX  9269 0 מום/64992 .
SFX  8754 Y 1
SFX  8754 י מי/64991 .
SFX  13697 Y 1
SFX  13697 י מי/64992 .
SFX  10571 Y 1
SFX  10571 0 וניתן/64993 .
SFX  6318 Y 1
SFX  6318 י מי/64993 .
SFX  12932 Y 1
SFX  12932 ב יבה/64991 .
SFX  9092 Y 1
SFX  9092 0 פתו/64991 .
SFX  8570 Y 1
SFX  8570 י מי/64995 .
SFX  5867 Y 1
SFX  5867 0 פתו/64992 .
SFX  7390 Y 1
SFX  7390 ב יבה/64992 .
SFX  9296 Y 1
SFX  9296 ב יבה/64993 .
SFX  7466 Y 1
SFX  7466 0 פתו/64993 .
SFX  11461 Y 1
SFX  11461 ף פתן/64992 .
SFX  9669 Y 1
SFX  9669 0 ילוכן/64992 .
SFX  13143 Y 1
SFX  13143 0 צון/64991 .
SFX  7141 Y 1
SFX  7141 0 צון/64992 .
SFX  9724 Y 1
SFX  9724 ב יבה/64999 .
SFX  13673 Y 1
SFX  13673 ו ילהו/64992 .
SFX  12078 Y 1
SFX  12078 ר שרים/64991 .
SFX  7023 Y 1
SFX  7023 0 ייהן/64993 .
SFX  13875 Y 1
SFX  13875 ר שרים/64992 .
SFX  7692 Y 1
SFX  7692 ח ין/64991 .
SFX  11758 Y 1
SFX  11758 ח ין/64992 .
SFX  8428 Y 1
SFX  8428 ח ין/64993 .
SFX  12886 Y 1
SFX  12886 ל ננו/64991 .
SFX  6426 Y 1
SFX  6426 0 ניתנו/64993 .
SFX  6636 Y 1
SFX  6636 ל ננו/64992 .
SFX  6815 Y 1
SFX  6815 ל ננו/64993 .
SFX  12443 Y 1
SFX  12443 0 יענו/64991 .
SFX  6157 Y 1
SFX  6157 0 כן/64991 .
SFX  5006 Y 1
SFX  5006 0 כן/64992 .
SFX  5608 Y 1
SFX  5608 0 יענו/64992 .
SFX  9434 Y 1
SFX  9434 0 יענו/64993 .
SFX  5347 Y 1
SFX  5347 0 כן/64993 .
SFX  11810 Y 1
SFX  11810 ר שקו/64992 .
SFX  9384 Y 1
SFX  9384 ל ננו/64998 .
SFX  11368 Y 1
SFX  11368 ל ננו/64999 .
SFX  5085 Y 1
SFX  5085 0 כן/64996 .
SFX  12359 Y 1
SFX  12359 0 דתו/64991 .
SFX  11140 Y 1
SFX  11140 0 יענו/64998 .
SFX  8902 Y 1
SFX  8902 0 דתו/64992 .
SFX  5844 Y 1
SFX  5844 0 כן/64998 .
SFX  12915 Y 1
SFX  12915 0 ימיי/64991 .
SFX  11039 Y 1
SFX  11039 0 יענו/64999 .
SFX  9069 Y 1
SFX  9069 0 קותיכן/64991 .
SFX  6829 Y 1
SFX  6829 0 כן/64999 .
SFX  7593 Y 1
SFX  7593 0 דתו/64993 .
SFX  5277 Y 1
SFX  5277 0 קותיכן/64993 .
SFX  7951 Y 1
SFX  7951 0 ימיי/64993 .
SFX  6380 Y 1
SFX  6380 ם ני/64991 .
SFX  10779 Y 1
SFX  10779 ם ני/64992 .
SFX  9221 Y 1
SFX  9221 ם ני/64993 .
SFX  12444 Y 1
SFX  12444 0 יען/64991 .
SFX  6158 Y 1
SFX  6158 0 כם/64991 .
SFX  13364 Y 1
SFX  13364 ם ני/64995 .
SFX  5007 Y 1
SFX  5007 0 כם/64992 .
SFX  5609 Y 1
SFX  5609 0 יען/64992 .
SFX  9435 Y 1
SFX  9435 0 יען/64993 .
SFX  5348 Y 1
SFX  5348 0 כם/64993 .
SFX  13508 Y 1
SFX  13508 ם ני/64997 .
SFX  5086 Y 1
SFX  5086 0 כם/64996 .
SFX  12191 Y 1
SFX  12191 0 חתנו/64991 .
SFX  11040 Y 1
SFX  11040 0 יען/64998 .
SFX  8840 Y 1
SFX  8840 0 חתנו/64992 .
SFX  5845 Y 1
SFX  5845 0 כם/64998 .
SFX  6830 Y 1
SFX  6830 0 כם/64999 .
SFX  5445 Y 1
SFX  5445 0 רי/64991 .
SFX  6522 Y 1
SFX  6522 0 חתנו/64993 .
SFX  13561 Y 1
SFX  13561 0 רי/64992 .
SFX  5736 Y 1
SFX  5736 0 רי/64993 .
SFX  10454 Y 1
SFX  10454 0 רי/64994 .
SFX  13083 Y 1
SFX  13083 ח לו/64991 .
SFX  6757 Y 1
SFX  6757 0 רי/64995 .
SFX  8234 Y 1
SFX  8234 ח לו/64992 .
SFX  13320 Y 1
SFX  13320 ן נע/64992 .
SFX  6366 Y 1
SFX  6366 ח לו/64993 .
SFX  7678 Y 1
SFX  7678 0 מלי/64991 .
SFX  13829 Y 1
SFX  13829 0 מלי/64992 .
SFX  13912 Y 1
SFX  13912 0 רי/64999 .
SFX  12838 Y 1
SFX  12838 0 מלי/64993 .
SFX  10570 Y 1
SFX  10570 0 וניתנו/64993 .
SFX  10488 Y 1
SFX  10488 ח לו/64995 .
SFX  13803 Y 1
SFX  13803 0 יבין/64992 .
SFX  7550 Y 1
SFX  7550 0 רון/64991 .
SFX  7269 Y 1
SFX  7269 0 רון/64992 .
SFX  12207 Y 1
SFX  12207 0 חותיה/64991 .
SFX  11912 Y 1
SFX  11912 0 רון/64993 .
SFX  10676 Y 1
SFX  10676 0 יבין/64994 .
SFX  8245 Y 1
SFX  8245 0 מנו/64991 .
SFX  6682 Y 1
SFX  6682 ח ים/64991 .
SFX  11352 Y 1
SFX  11352 ח לו/64999 .
SFX  5030 Y 1
SFX  5030 0 מנו/64992 .
SFX  7747 Y 1
SFX  7747 ח ים/64992 .
SFX  8427 Y 1
SFX  8427 ח ים/64993 .
SFX  6542 Y 1
SFX  6542 0 חותיה/64993 .
SFX  6134 Y 1
SFX  6134 0 מנו/64993 .
SFX  10330 Y 1
SFX  10330 0 מנו/64995 .
SFX  7140 Y 1
SFX  7140 0 צוני/64992 .
SFX  13142 Y 1
SFX  13142 0 צוני/64993 .
SFX  13672 Y 1
SFX  13672 ו ילוה/64992 .
SFX  10385 Y 1
SFX  10385 0 מנו/64998 .
SFX  7052 Y 1
SFX  7052 0 מנו/64999 .
SFX  7022 Y 1
SFX  7022 0 ייו/64993 .
SFX  7378 Y 1
SFX  7378 ן תב/64992 .
SFX  7660 Y 1
SFX  7660 ח ינה/64991 .
SFX  11916 Y 1
SFX  11916 ח ינה/64992 .
SFX  7155 Y 1
SFX  7155 0 צים/64991 .
SFX  13832 Y 1
SFX  13832 0 צים/64992 .
SFX  11193 Y 1
SFX  11193 ח ינה/64993 .
SFX  12152 Y 1
SFX  12152 0 נתני/64991 .
SFX  9969 Y 1
SFX  9969 ח ינה/64994 .
SFX  11208 Y 1
SFX  11208 0 צים/64994 .
SFX  7991 Y 1
SFX  7991 0 נתני/64992 .
SFX  8838 Y 1
SFX  8838 ה וך/64991 .
SFX  6789 Y 1
SFX  6789 ה וך/64992 .
SFX  6156 Y 1
SFX  6156 0 נו/64991 .
SFX  5005 Y 1
SFX  5005 0 נו/64992 .
SFX  5084 Y 1
SFX  5084 0 נו/64993 .
SFX  12163 Y 1
SFX  12163 ר שתה/64991 .
SFX  5633 Y 1
SFX  5633 0 נו/64994 .
SFX  8472 Y 1
SFX  8472 ר שתה/64992 .
SFX  11976 Y 1
SFX  11976 0 נו/64996 .
SFX  8403 Y 1
SFX  8403 ר שתה/64993 .
SFX  12358 Y 1
SFX  12358 0 דתך/64991 .
SFX  6707 Y 1
SFX  6707 0 נו/64997 .
SFX  8901 Y 1
SFX  8901 0 דתך/64992 .
SFX  6791 Y 1
SFX  6791 0 נו/64998 .
SFX  9068 Y 1
SFX  9068 0 קותינו/64991 .
SFX  7592 Y 1
SFX  7592 0 דתך/64993 .
SFX  5843 Y 1
SFX  5843 0 נו/64999 .
SFX  6932 Y 1
SFX  6932 ם מנו/64992 .
SFX  13485 Y 1
SFX  13485 ם מנו/64993 .
SFX  5276 Y 1
SFX  5276 0 קותינו/64993 .
SFX  8871 Y 1
SFX  8871 ד ורים/64991 .
SFX  9284 Y 1
SFX  9284 ם מנו/64998 .
SFX  8016 Y 1
SFX  8016 0 ממנה/64992 .
SFX  11437 Y 1
SFX  11437 ם מנו/64999 .
SFX  6110 Y 1
SFX  6110 0 יבית/64991 .
SFX  11010 Y 1
SFX  11010 0 ממנה/64994 .
SFX  12571 Y 1
SFX  12571 0 יפיכן/64991 .
SFX  13935 Y 1
SFX  13935 0 יפיכן/64992 .
SFX  6616 Y 1
SFX  6616 0 חלו/64992 .
SFX  13405 Y 1
SFX  13405 0 יפיכן/64993 .
SFX  12155 Y 1
SFX  12155 ר שך/64991 .
SFX  5941 Y 1
SFX  5941 0 ק/64991 .
SFX  5124 Y 1
SFX  5124 0 ק/64992 .
SFX  5068 Y 1
SFX  5068 ר שך/64992 .
SFX  8455 Y 1
SFX  8455 ר שך/64993 .
SFX  8019 Y 1
SFX  8019 0 ק/64993 .
SFX  13649 Y 1
SFX  13649 0 יריהו/64992 .
SFX  9315 Y 1
SFX  9315 0 ק/64994 .
SFX  11303 Y 1
SFX  11303 0 חלו/64999 .
SFX  9620 Y 1
SFX  9620 0 יריהו/64994 .
SFX  8210 Y 1
SFX  8210 0 ק/64996 .
SFX  13183 Y 1
SFX  13183 ם ממות/64991 .
SFX  10584 Y 1
SFX  10584 0 ק/64997 .
SFX  10497 Y 1
SFX  10497 ר שך/64997 .
SFX  7894 Y 1
SFX  7894 0 וריות/64991 .
SFX  9025 Y 1
SFX  9025 ר שך/64998 .
