dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.dic
המלט/5005,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,7542,9959,10057,10800,10801,10802,10803,10804,10805,64994
הצטרף/7699,7700,7703,7706,7707,64993
הרוו/5001,5002,5003,5004,5008,5095,5096,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5208,5397,5818,5939,6190,6191,6192,6193,6822,8330,8840,8841,8842,8843,8846,8854,9429,9814,10968,64992
התקיף/8061,8062,8063,9829,9830,9831,9832,11461,11462,11463,64993
התרו/10077,10974,10975,10988,10989,10992,10997,11004,11005,11006,11007,11008,11009,11010,11013,11017,11018,11023,11024,11025,11390,11391,11394,64992
יגע/5026,5075,5076,5082,5087,5088,5090,5091,5093,5107,5108,5109,5120,5121,5122,5171,5173,5174,5175,5176,5177,5178,5179,5181,5182,5192,5194,5373,5374,5375,5599,5634,5838,5840,5842,5843,5844,5845,6194,6278,6709,6710,6711,9659,9660,9661,9662,9663,9664,9665,9669,9670,10192,11695,11704,11717,11723,64991
יוד/5004,5016,5026,5031,5059,5605,5607,5608,5609,5610,5611,5612,5613,5622,5626,5654,5656,5671,5778,5884,6044,6101,6150,6152,6153,6154,6189,6194,6617,9480,9481,9482,9483,9484,9485,9486,9514,9515,9897,9898,9899,11740,11741,64991
ייפו/5123,5204,5206,5207,5208,5209,5210,5211,5212,5213,5214,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5342,5638,5735,5939,6114,6401,7017,7018,7019,7020,7021,7022,7023,7024,7025,7026,7027,7028,7029,7114,7248,64992
ימלט/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5016,5028,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5395,5396,6822,7635,7636,7637,7638,7639,11851,64992
יתום/5362,5363,5364,9287,11931,64991
מלת/5001,5002,6107,6499,6504,6514,6515,6518,6521,6522,6523,6524,6525,6527,6533,6534,6535,6536,6537,6538,6539,6540,6541,6542,7969,8001,8254,8535,8537,8538,8539,8540,8541,8542,8543,8544,8545,8546,8547,8548,8549,8550,8551,8552,8553,8554,8555,64993
מעכי/5454,5463,5736,5738,5830,6488,6489,7897,9143,9151,9152,9153,9154,9155,9156,9157,9158,9159,9160,9161,9162,9163,9164,9165,9166,9167,9168,9169,9170,9171,9172,9173,9174,9175,9176,9177,9178,9179,9180,11941,12546,13129,64995
מרור/5079,5084,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,8220,8402,12500,12501,13196,64991
מתנו/5090,5104,5105,5161,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5510,5595,5630,5631,5632,5633,5634,5792,5866,5877,5882,7015,11025,11658,12432,12488,12763,12801,12804,12810,12822,12826,13043,13133,13135,13269,13270,13272,64993
מתעד/5080,5082,5089,5093,5125,5192,5193,5194,5365,5655,6118,6119,6120,6121,6122,6123,6124,6125,6126,6127,6155,6156,6157,6158,6159,6160,6161,6162,6163,6164,6165,6166,6167,6168,6169,6170,6171,6172,6173,6174,6175,6176,6177,7112,7223,7438,7441,7443,8760,11000,11110,11623,11667,12674,64991
נוטרי/5161,5162,5163,5164,5165,5166,5167,5168,5169,5170,7537,7538,7539,10560,10561,10562,10563,10564,10565,10566,10567,10568,10569,10570,10571,10572,10573,10574,10575,10576,10577,10578,64993
נימך/6328,7729,64993
שוער/13345,64991
שטי/5365,5941,5943,5946,7440,7442,7443,7444,7445,7454,7466,7467,7468,7469,7470,7471,7472,7473,7474,7475,7476,7477,7478,7479,7480,7481,64993
תחומי/5079,5084,5093,5192,5193,5194,5333,5345,5346,5347,5348,5365,5366,5367,5369,5370,7753,13697,64991
תחקו/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5008,5064,5124,5150,5444,5446,5447,5454,5456,5458,5459,5460,5461,5462,5465,5467,5468,5469,5471,5473,5474,5475,5476,5477,5736,6822,64992
תכנית/5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5133,5134,5135,5136,5138,5139,5140,5141,5142,5143,5144,6413,6414,6415,6416,6417,6418,6419,6420,6421,6422,6423,6424,6425,6426,6427,6428,6429,6430,6431,64991
תספר/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5016,5026,5028,5057,5058,5059,5060,5061,5062,5063,5064,5065,5205,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5707,5922,5923,5924,5926,5927,5928,6107,6194,6822,7261,7269,7270,7271,7273,7274,7275,7276,13561,13587,13588,13589,13590,13591,13592,13593,13594,64992
תצמח/5009,5016,6107,11716,11860,64992
תתכופף/6319,13544,13545,64992
תתרו/5001,5031,5033,5146,5148,5150,5319,5448,5449,5511,5952,6326,6720,7246,7250,7804,8016,9239,9897,10032,10036,10037,11496,11726,11746,11788,11897,13736,13860,13861,13862,13883,64992
